California statutes. Penal Code
(k) Any agreements entered into under this section for Medi-Cal or a LIHP to provide for reimbursement of acute inpatient hospital services and administrative expenditures as described in subdivision (c) shall not be subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100)
 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(l) This section shall be implemented in a manner that is consistent with federal Medicaid law and regulations. The Director of the State Department of Health Care Services shall seek any federal approvals necessary for the implementation of this section. This section shall be implemented only when and to the extent that any necessary federal approval is obtained, and only to the extent that existing levels of federal financial participation are not otherwise jeopardized.

(m) To the extent that the Director of the State Department of Health Care Services determines that existing levels of federal financial participation are jeopardized, this section shall no longer be implemented.

(n) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of
 Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may, without taking any further regulatory action, implement this section by means of all-county letters, provider bulletins, facility letters, or similar instructions.

(o) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) The term “county of last legal residence” means the county in which the inmate resided at the time of arrest that resulted in conviction and incarceration in a state prison facility.

(2) The term “inmate” means an adult who is involuntarily residing in a state prison facility operated, administered, or regulated, directly or indirectly, by the department.

(3) During the existence of the receivership established in United
 States District Court for the Northern District of California, Case No. C01-1351 TEH, Plata v. Schwarzenegger, references in this section to the “secretary” shall mean the receiver appointed in that action, who shall implement portions of this section that would otherwise be within the secretary’s responsibility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 162.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5073.

(a) When jurisdiction of an inmate is transferred from or between the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the State Department of State Hospitals, and county agencies caring for inmates, these agencies shall disclose, by electronic transmission when possible, mental health records for any transferred inmate who received mental health services while in the custody of the transferring facility. The mental health records shall be disclosed at the time of transfer or within seven days of the transfer of custody, except when the person is transferred to a state hospital when the records shall be provided prior to, or at the time of, transfer.

(b) Mental health records shall be disclosed by and between a county correctional facility, county medical facility, state correctional
 facility, state hospital, or state-assigned mental health provider to ensure sufficient mental health history is available for the purpose of satisfying the requirements of Section 2962 for inmate evaluations and to ensure the continuity of mental health treatment of an inmate being transferred between those facilities.

(c) For the purpose of this section, “mental health records” includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Clinician assessments, contact notes, and progress notes.

(2) Date of mental health treatment and services.

(3) Incident reports.

(4) List of an inmate’s medical conditions and medications.

(5) Psychiatrist assessments, contact notes, and progress notes.

(6) Suicide watch, mental health crisis, or alternative housing placement records.

(d) All transmissions made pursuant to this section shall comply with the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of the Civil Code), Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 123100) of Part 1 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, the Information Practices Act of 1977 Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) (Public Law 104-191), the federal Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act (HITECH) (Public Law 111-005), and the corresponding implementing regulations relating to privacy and security in Parts 160
 and 164 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 968, Sec. 2.   (AB 2526)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. The Board of Parole Hearings [5075. - 5081.]

5075.

(a) There is hereby created the Board of Parole Hearings. Any reference to the Board of Prison Terms in this code or any other law refers to the Board of Parole Hearings. As of July 1, 2005, the Board of Prison Terms is abolished.

(b) (1) The Governor shall appoint 21 commissioners, subject to Senate confirmation, pursuant to this section. These commissioners shall be appointed and trained to hear only adult matters. Except as specified in paragraph (3), commissioners shall hold office for terms of three years, each term to commence on the expiration
 date of the predecessor. An appointment to a vacancy that occurs for any reason other than expiration of the term shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term. Commissioners are eligible for reappointment.

(2) The terms of the commissioners shall expire as follows:

(A) Seven shall expire on July 1, 2022.

(B) Seven
 shall expire on July 1,
 2023.

(C) Seven shall expire on July 1, 2024.

(3) The terms of the four commissioners whose positions were created by the act that increased the number of commissioners to 21 in paragraph (1) shall begin on July 1, 2021, and shall be as follows: one commissioner’s term shall be for one year, two commissioners’ terms shall be for two years, and one commissioner’s term shall be for three years.

(4) The selection of persons and their appointment by the Governor and confirmation by the Senate shall reflect as nearly as possible a cross section of the racial, sexual orientation, gender identity, economic, and geographic features of the population of the state.

(c) The
 Governor may designate a chairperson of the board periodically. The Governor shall appoint an executive officer of the board, subject to Senate confirmation, who shall hold office at the pleasure of the Governor. The executive officer shall be the administrative head of the board and shall exercise all duties and functions necessary to ensure that the responsibilities of the board are successfully discharged. The executive officer shall be the appointing
 authority for all civil service positions of employment with the board.

(d) Each commissioner shall participate in hearings on each workday, except if it is necessary for a commissioner to attend training, en banc hearings or full board meetings, or other administrative business requiring the participation of the commissioner. For purposes of this subdivision, these hearings include parole consideration hearings and parole rescission hearings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 80, Sec. 15.   (AB 145)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

5075.1.

The Board of Parole Hearings shall do all of the following:

(a) Conduct parole consideration hearings, parole rescission hearings, and parole progress hearings for adults under the jurisdiction of the department.

(b) Conduct mentally disordered offender hearings.

(c) Conduct sexually violent predator hearings.

(d) Review inmates’ requests for reconsideration of denial of good-time credit and setting of parole length or conditions, pursuant to Section 5077.

(e) Determine revocation of
 parole for adult offenders under the jurisdiction of the Division of Adult Parole Operations, pursuant to Section 5077.

(f) Conduct studies pursuant to Section 3150 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(g) Investigate and report on all applications for reprieves, pardons, and commutation of sentence, as provided in Title 6 (commencing with Section 4800) of Part 3.

(h) Exercise other powers and duties as prescribed by law.

(i) Effective January 1, 2007, all commissioners appointed and trained to hear juvenile parole matters, together with their duties prescribed by law as functions of the Board of Parole Hearings concerning wards under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, are transferred to the Director of the Division
 of Juvenile Justice. All applicable regulations in effect at the time of transfer shall be deemed to apply to those commissioners until new regulations are adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 33, Sec. 25.   (SB 843)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5075.5.

All commissioners and deputy commissioners who conduct hearings for the purpose of considering the parole suitability of prisoners or the setting of a parole release date for prisoners, shall receive initial training on domestic violence cases and intimate partner battering and its effects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 215, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

5075.6.

(a) Commissioners and deputy commissioners hearing matters concerning adults under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall have a broad background in criminal justice and an ability for appraisal of adult offenders, the crimes for which those persons are committed, and the evaluation of an individual’s progress toward reformation. Insofar as practicable, commissioners and deputy commissioners shall have a varied interest in adult correction work, public safety, and shall have experience or education in the fields of corrections, sociology, law, law enforcement, medicine, mental health, or education. In addition, insofar as practicable, commissioners and deputy commissioners may have professional or lived
 experience or educational background that may enhance the expertise of the parole board, including, but not limited to, the areas of social work, substance use disorder treatment, foster care, rehabilitation, community reentry, or the effects of trauma and poverty. 

(b) All commissioners and deputy commissioners who conduct hearings for the purpose of considering the parole suitability of inmates, the setting of a parole release date for inmates, or the revocation of parole for adult parolees, shall, within 60 days of appointment and annually thereafter undergo a minimum of 40 hours of training in the following areas:

(1) Treatment and training programs provided to inmates at Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation institutions, including, but not limited to, educational, vocational, mental health, medical, substance abuse, psychotherapeutic
 counseling, and sex offender treatment programs.

(2) Parole services.

(3) Commissioner duties and responsibilities.

(4) Knowledge of laws and regulations applicable to conducting parole hearings, including the rights of victims, witnesses, and inmates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 80, Sec. 16.   (AB 145)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

5076.

Each commissioner of the board shall devote his entire time to the duties of his office and shall receive an annual salary provided for by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1446, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5076.1.

(a) The board shall meet at each of the state prisons and facilities under the jurisdiction of the Division of Adult Institutions. Meetings shall be held at whatever times may be necessary for a full and complete study of the cases of all inmates whose matters are considered. Other times and places of meeting may also be designated by the board. Each commissioner of the board shall receive their actual necessary traveling expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties. Where the board performs its functions by meeting en banc in either public or executive sessions to decide matters of general policy, a majority of commissioners holding office on the date the matter is heard shall be present, and no action shall be valid unless it is concurred in by a majority vote of those present.

(b) The board may use deputy commissioners to whom it may assign appropriate duties, including hearing cases and making decisions. Those decisions shall be made in accordance with policies approved by a majority of commissioners holding office.

(c) The board may meet and transact business in panels. Each panel shall consist of two or more persons, subject to subdivision (d) of Section 3041. No action shall be valid unless concurred in by a majority vote of the persons present. In the event of a tie vote, the matter shall be referred for en banc review by the board. The commissioners conducting the review shall consider the full record that was before the panel that resulted in the tie vote. The review shall be limited to the full record that was before the panel that resulted in the tie vote. New evidence or comment shall not be considered in the en banc proceeding. A commissioner
 who was involved in the tie vote shall be recused from consideration of the matter in the en banc review.

(d) Consideration of parole release for persons sentenced to life imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1168 shall be heard by a panel of two or more commissioners or deputy commissioners, of which only one may be a deputy commissioner. A recommendation for recall of a sentence under Section 1172.1 shall be made by a panel of two or more commissioners or deputy commissioners, of which only one may be a deputy commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 58, Sec. 28.   (AB 200)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5076.2.

(a) Any rules and regulations, including any resolutions and policy statements, promulgated by the Board of Parole Hearings, shall be promulgated and filed pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and shall, to the extent practical, be stated in language that is easily understood by the general public.

(b) The Board of
 Parole Hearings
 shall maintain, publish and make available to the general public, a compendium of its rules and regulations, including any resolutions and policy statements, promulgated pursuant to this section.

(c) The exception specified in this subdivision to the procedures specified in this section shall apply to the Board of Parole Hearings. The executive officer may specify an effective date that is any time more than 30 days after the rule or regulation is filed with the Secretary of State. However, no less than 20 days prior to that effective date, copies of the rule or regulation shall be posted in conspicuous places throughout each institution and shall be mailed to all persons or organizations who request
 them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 80, Sec. 18.   (AB 145)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

5076.3.

The executive officer of the Board of Parole Hearings shall have the authority of a head of a department set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 11181 of the Government Code to issue subpoenas as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The board shall adopt regulations on the policies and guidelines for the issuance of
 subpoenas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 80, Sec. 19.   (AB 145)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

5077.

The Board of Prison Terms shall review the prisoners’ requests for reconsideration of denial of good-time credit, and setting of parole length or conditions, and shall have the authority to modify the previously made decisions of the Department of Corrections as to these matters. The revocation of parole shall be determined by the Board of Prison Terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 357, Sec. 2.   Effective August 19, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

5078.

(a) The Board of Prison Terms shall succeed to and shall exercise and perform all powers and duties granted to, exercised by, and imposed upon the Adult Authority, the California Women’s Board of Terms and Paroles, and the Community Release Board.

(b) The Adult Authority and California Women’s Board of Terms and Paroles are abolished.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 255.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.

The Director of Corrections shall provide facilities and licensed professional personnel for a psychiatric and diagnostic clinic and such branches thereof as may be required at one or more of the state prisons or institutions under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections. The director shall have full administrative authority and responsibility for operation of the clinics. All required mental health treatment or diagnostic services shall be provided under the supervision of a psychiatrist licensed to practice in this state, or a psychologist licensed to practice in this state and who holds a doctoral degree and has at least two years of
 experience in the diagnosis and treatment of emotional and mental disorders. All such clinics shall be under the direction of such a psychiatrist or psychologist. A psychiatrist shall be available to assume responsibility for all acts of diagnosis or treatment which may only be performed by a licensed physician and surgeon.

The work of the clinic shall include a scientific study of each prisoner, his or her career and life history, the cause of his or her criminal acts and recommendations for his or her care, training, and employment with a view to his or her reformation and to the protection of society. The recommendation shall be submitted to the Director of Corrections and shall not be effective until approved by the director. The Director of Corrections may modify or reject the recommendations as he or she sees fit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1123, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5080.

The Director of Corrections may transfer persons confined in one state prison institution or facility of the Department of Corrections to another. The Board of Prison Terms may request the Director of Corrections to transfer an inmate who is under its parole-granting jurisdiction if, after review of the case history in the course of routine procedures, such transfer is deemed advisable for the further diagnosis, and treatment of the inmate. The director shall as soon as practicable comply with such request, provided that, if facilities are not available he shall report that fact to the Board of Prison Terms and shall make the transfer as soon as facilities become available;
 provided further, that if in the opinion of the Director of Corrections such transfer would endanger security he may report that fact to the Board of Prison Terms and refuse to make such transfer.

When transferring an inmate from one state prison, institution, or facility of the Department of Corrections to another, the director may, as necessary or convenient, authorize transportation via a route that lies partly outside this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 255.)
-------------------------------------------

5081.

The Governor may remove any member of the Board of Prison Terms for misconduct, incompetency or neglect of duty after a full hearing by the Board of Corrections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 255.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. The Robert Presley Center of Crime and Justice Studies [5085. - 5088.]

5085.

The Robert Presley Institute of Corrections Research and Training, which provides and aggregates research on youth and adult corrections education and training, is hereby renamed the Robert Presley Center of Crime and Justice Studies and shall be transferred to the University of California. It is the intent of the Legislature that the center be maintained on the Riverside campus of the University of California.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 778, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5086.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the university seek funding from federal, state, and private sources for research projects carried out by the center under the university’s direction. The center shall have the following research goals:

(a) To better protect the public from crime by determining the causes of, and means of preventing, violence, crime, and criminal deviance.

(b) To identify the methods and practices necessary for the
 most beneficial operation of law enforcement and local and state youth and adult correctional institutions.

(c) To reduce violence and recidivism rates in prisons, jails, and youth facilities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 778, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5087.

The chancellor of the Riverside campus may appoint an advisory committee to assist in establishing research priorities. The university shall consult with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Division of Juvenile Justice, local law enforcement, probation, parole, and correctional agencies, and persons of experience or education in other higher education institutions in the field of corrections or related fields on the activities of the center. These projects shall be related to the center’s goals as specified in Section 5086 and may also include, but not be limited to, applied and theoretical research in the following areas:

(a) Methods of ensuring
 secure, cost-effective, safe, and gang-free incarceration in California’s correctional institutions, including approaches to ameliorate overcrowding in those institutions.

(b) New approaches to reduce inmate and ward recidivism and consequent victimization of California citizens.

(c) Correctional facility management, planning, design, and construction.

(d) New approaches to rehabilitate inmates and wards during and after incarceration and to integrate offenders into society after incarceration.

(e) New approaches to inmate and ward diagnosis, classification, and treatment.

(f) At-promise
 youth and street gang activity.

(g) Law enforcement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 800, Sec. 16.   (AB 413)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5088.

The university shall negotiate and approve terms, services, and costs of contracts and research projects for purposes of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 778, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Division of Juvenile Facilities [6001. - 6005.]

6001.

Commencing July 1, 2005, the establishment, organization, jurisdiction, powers, duties, responsibilities, and functions of the Youth Authority as provided in the Youth Authority Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1700) of Division 2.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code), as it existed on June 30, 2005, are continued in the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 10, Sec. 52.   Effective May 10, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 99 of Ch. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

6005.

(a) Whenever a person confined to a correctional institution under the supervision of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation is charged with a public offense committed within the confines of that institution and is tried for that public offense, a city, county, or superior court shall be entitled to reimbursement for reasonable and necessary costs connected with that matter.

(b) The appropriate financial officer or other designated official of a county or the city
 finance officer of a city incurring any costs in connection with that matter shall make out a statement of all the costs incurred by the county or city for the investigation, the preparation for the trial, participation in the actual trial of the case, all guarding and keeping of the person, and the execution of the sentence of the person, properly certified to by a judge of the superior court of the county. The statement may not include any costs that are incurred by the superior court pursuant to subdivision (c). The statement shall be sent to the department for its approval. After the approval the department must cause the amount of the costs to be paid out of the money appropriated for the support of the department to the county treasurer of the county or the city finance officer of the city incurring those costs.

(c) The superior court shall prepare a statement of all costs incurred by the court for the preparation of the trial and the
 actual trial of the case. The statement may not include any costs that are incurred by the city or county pursuant to subdivision (a). The statement shall be sent to the Administrative Office of the Courts for approval and reimbursement.

(d) No city, county, or other jurisdiction may file, and the state may not reimburse, a claim pursuant to this section that is presented to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or to any other agency or department of the state more than six months after the close of the month in which the costs were incurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 175, Sec. 12.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Examination of Staff for Tuberculosis [6006. - 6009.]

6006.

The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall develop rules regarding the mandatory examination or testing for tuberculosis of the staff of the department. These rules shall include mandated annual examination for tuberculosis of employees whose primary job functions require them to work inside an institution and as a part of preemployment requirements. Except as provided in Section 6007, the confidentiality of the test results shall be maintained. However, statistical summaries that do not identify specific individuals may be
 prepared.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 10, Sec. 9.   (AB 134)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6006.5.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Annual TB screening” means a yearly risk assessment to determine the presence of tuberculosis (TB) symptoms in an individual.

(b) “Baseline TB screening and testing” means a process that includes an individual TB risk assessment and an initial TB test, as defined by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC).

(c) “Certificate” means a document signed by a licensed health care professional or their designee. The certificate shall indicate that the baseline TB screening and testing, annual TB screening, or medical evaluation was performed in
 accordance with the recommendations of the federal CDC.

(d) “Department” means the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(e) “Follow up care” means continued medical evaluations or treatment of a person after their initial baseline TB screening and testing or annual TB screening.

(f) “Institution” means any state prison, camp, or other facility where incarcerated persons are housed under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(g) “Medical evaluation” means a gathering of patient information by a licensed health care professional, which may include, but is not limited to, a comprehensive history, physical examination, or tests in accordance with the recommendations of the federal CDC used to diagnose, assess, and
 treat TB.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 10, Sec. 11.   (AB 134)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6007.

(a) A person who is employed by the department and whose primary job functions require them to work inside an institution shall complete baseline TB screening and testing and shall provide a certificate to the department within seven days of appointment to their position showing they are free of active tuberculosis. The employee shall not be allowed to perform any job duties within a licensed area within the institution until the certificate has been submitted and accepted by the department.

(b) (1) An employee whose primary job functions require them to work inside an institution shall receive annual TB screening and ensure that certificates are submitted and accepted by the department showing they are free of active
 tuberculosis. If an employee is suspected of having active tuberculosis during an annual TB screening, the employee shall have a medical evaluation to determine the need for follow up care in accordance with the recommendations of the federal CDC.

(2) The department may require more frequent TB screening or testing, including skin or blood tests, if there is a known exposure or ongoing transmission within an institution.

(c) The department shall ensure that all annual TB screenings are:

(1) Offered to the employee promptly at a reasonable time and place.

(2) Offered at no cost to the employee.

(3) Performed by, or under the supervision of, a licensed health care professional.

(d) The department may contract with a licensed health care professional to administer the baseline TB screening and testing, annual TB screening, or medical evaluations. An employee who declines the department’s offer of these services shall obtain the services through their personal licensed health care providers at no cost to the department.

(e) Follow up care for tuberculosis shall be pursued through the workers’ compensation system as provided in Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) and Division 5 (commencing with Section 6300) of the Labor Code for job-related incidents or through the employee’s health insurance plan for non-job-related incidents. The department shall file a report for an employee whose test or medical evaluation for tuberculosis is positive. In addition, the department shall follow the guidelines, policies, and procedures of the workers’ compensation
 early intervention program pursuant to Section 3214 of the Labor Code.

(f) The department shall maintain a file containing an up-to-date certificate for each employee.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 10, Sec. 13.   (AB 134)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6009.

In enacting this chapter, the Legislature hereby finds and declares that tuberculosis is a serious contagious disease. It is vital to the health and safety of inmates, employees, and the public at large, to conduct appropriate examinations and testing and to ensure that staff who test positive for tuberculosis obtain appropriate treatment in order to control the spread of tuberculosis in California’s institutions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 932, Sec. 8.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. The Corrections Standards Authority [6024. - 6048.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [6024. - 6034.]

6024.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2012, there is hereby established the Board of State and Community Corrections. The Board of State and Community Corrections shall be an entity independent of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. The Governor may appoint an executive officer of the board, subject to Senate confirmation, who shall hold the office at the pleasure of the Governor. The executive officer shall be the administrative head of the board and shall exercise all duties and functions necessary to ensure that the responsibilities of the board are successfully discharged. As of July 1, 2012, any references to the Board of Corrections or the Corrections Standards Authority shall refer to the Board of State and Community Corrections. As of that date, the Corrections Standards Authority is abolished.

(b) The mission of the board shall include providing statewide leadership, coordination, and technical assistance to promote effective state and local efforts and partnerships in California’s adult and juvenile criminal justice system, including addressing gang problems, and to promote legal and safe conditions for youth, inmates, and staff in local detention facilities. This mission shall reflect the principle of aligning fiscal policy and correctional practices, including, but not limited to prevention, intervention, suppression, supervision, and incapacitation, to promote a justice investment strategy that fits each county and is consistent with the integrated statewide goal of improved public safety through cost-effective, promising, and evidence-based strategies for managing criminal justice populations.

(c) The board shall regularly seek advice from a balanced range of
 stakeholders and subject matter experts on issues pertaining to adult corrections, juvenile justice, and gang problems relevant to its mission. Toward this end, the board shall seek to ensure that its efforts (1) are systematically informed by experts and stakeholders with the most specific knowledge concerning the subject matter, (2) include the participation of those who must implement a board decision and are impacted by a board decision, and (3) promote collaboration and innovative problem solving consistent with the mission of the board. The board may create special committees, with the authority to establish working subgroups as necessary, in furtherance of this subdivision to carry out specified tasks and to submit its findings and recommendations from that effort to the board.

(d) The board shall act as the supervisory board of the state planning agency pursuant to federal acts. It shall annually review and approve, or review, revise,
 and approve, the comprehensive state plan for the improvement of criminal justice and delinquency and gang prevention activities throughout the state, shall establish priorities for the use of funds as are available pursuant to federal acts, and shall approve the expenditure of all funds pursuant to such plans or federal acts, provided that the approval of those expenditures may be granted to single projects or to groups of projects.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that any statutory authority conferred on the Corrections Standards Authority or the previously abolished Board of Corrections shall apply to the Board of State and Community Corrections on and after July 1, 2012, unless expressly repealed by the act that added this section. The Board of State and Community Corrections is the successor to the Corrections Standards Authority, and as of July 1, 2012, is vested with all of the authority’s rights, powers, authority, and duties,
 unless specifically repealed by this act.

(f) For purposes of this chapter, “federal acts” means Subchapter V of Chapter 46 of the federal Omnibus Crime Control and Safe Streets Act of 1968 (Public Law 90-351, 82 Stat. 197; 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3750 et seq.) and any act or acts amendatory or supplemental thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 50, Sec. 2.   (AB 169)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6025.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2012, the Board of State and Community Corrections shall be composed of 12 members, as follows:

(1) The Chair of the Board of State and Community Corrections, who shall be the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(2) The Director of the Division of Adult Parole Operations for the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(3) A county sheriff in charge of a local detention facility which has a Corrections Standards Authority rated capacity of 200 or fewer inmates, appointed by the Governor, subject to
 Senate confirmation.

(4) A county sheriff in charge of a local detention facility which has a Corrections Standards Authority rated capacity of over 200 inmates, appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation.

(5) A county supervisor or county administrative officer. This member shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation.

(6) A chief probation officer from a county with a population over 200,000, appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation.

(7) A chief probation officer from a county with a population under 200,000, appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation.

(8) A judge appointed by the Judicial Council of California.

(9) A chief of police, appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation.

(10) A community provider of rehabilitative treatment or services for adult offenders, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(11) A community provider or advocate with expertise in effective programs, policies, and treatment of at-promise youth and juvenile offenders, appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(12) A public member, appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation.

(b) Commencing July 1, 2013, the Board of State and Community Corrections shall be composed of 13 members, as follows:

(1) The Chair of the Board of State and Community Corrections, who shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation.

(2) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(3) The Director of the Division of Adult Parole Operations for the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(4) The individuals listed in paragraphs (3) to (12), inclusive, of subdivision (a), who shall serve or continue to serve terms as provided in subdivision (e).

(c) Commencing July 1, 2024, the Board of State and Community Corrections shall be composed of 15 members, as follows:

(1) The individuals described in subdivision (b), who shall serve or continue to serve terms as provided in subdivision (e).

(2) A licensed health care provider, appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation.

(3) A licensed mental or behavioral health care provider, appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation.

(d) The Chair of the Board of State and Community Corrections shall serve full time.

(e) Members shall hold office for terms of three years, each term
 to commence on the expiration date of the predecessor. Any appointment to a vacancy that occurs for any reason other than expiration of the term shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term. Members are eligible for reappointment.

(f) The board shall select a vice chairperson from among its members, who shall be either a chief probation officer or a sheriff.
 Eight members of the board shall constitute a quorum.

(g) When the board is hearing charges against any member, the individual concerned shall not sit as a member of the board for the period of hearing of charges and the determination of recommendations to the Governor.

(h) If any appointed member is not in attendance for three meetings in any calendar year, the board shall inform the appointing authority, which may remove that member and make a new appointment, as provided in this section, for the remainder of the term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 51.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6025.1.
